Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3803
Amendment by owner.

Except with respect to property to which section 76-3804 applies, an owner of real property subject to an unlawful restriction may submit to the recorder for recordation in the land records an amendment to remove the unlawful restriction, but only as to the owner's property.

Laws 2025, LB21, § 3.